Colorado statutes. TITLE 31 Government - Municipal
PART 1
ORGANIZATIONAL STRUCTURE AND OFFICERS
OF STATUTORY CITIES

31-4-101. Corporate authority vested.

The corporate and municipal authority of cities shall be vested in a governing body, to be denominated the city council, together with such officers as may be created under the authority of this title.

The city council shall possess all the legislative powers granted to cities by law and other corporate powers of the city not conferred by law or by some ordinance of city council on some officer or agency of the city. The members of the city council shall have the management and control of the finances and all the property, real and personal, belonging to the corporation, and they shall determine the times and places of holding their meetings, which shall at all times be open to the public. The mayor and any three members may call special meetings by notice to each of the members of the city council personally served or left at his usual place of residence. The city council shall provide by ordinance for the appointment or for the election of such city officers, whose election or appointment has not been provided for by law, as are necessary for the good government of the city and for the due exercise of its municipal powers. All city officers whose terms of office are not prescribed in this title and whose powers and duties are not otherwise defined by law shall perform such duties, exercise such powers, and continue in office for such period, until their successors are appointed and qualified, as shall be prescribed by ordinance. All officers to be elected shall be elected at the regular election. The officers of cities shall receive such compensation and fees for their services as the city council shall by ordinance prescribe.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1023, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 81:

(1) amended, p. 1493, § 2, effective May 28.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former §§ 31-5-101 and 31-5-106 as they existed prior to 1975.

31-4-102. Mayor - qualifications and duties.

The mayor shall be elected at the regular election in the city. He or she shall be a registered elector who has resided within the limits of the city for a period of at least twelve consecutive months immediately preceding the date of the election; except that, in the case of annexation, any person who has resided within the annexed territory for the time prescribed in this subsection (1) shall be deemed to have met the residence requirements for the city to which the territory was annexed. The mayor shall hold the office for the term for which he or she has been elected or qualified. The mayor shall keep an office at some convenient place in the city, to be provided by the city council, and shall sign all documents which by statute or ordinance may require his or her signature.

The mayor of the city shall be its chief executive officer and conservator of the peace, and it is his special duty to cause the ordinances and the regulations of the city to be faithfully and constantly obeyed. He shall supervise the conduct of all the officers of the city, examine the grounds of all reasonable complaints made against any of them, and cause any violations or neglect of duty to be promptly corrected or reported to the proper tribunal for punishment and correction. The mayor has and shall exercise, within the city limits, the powers conferred upon the sheriffs of counties to suppress disorders and keep the peace. He shall also perform such other duties compatible with the nature of his office as the city council may from time to time require.

The mayor shall be the presiding officer of the city council and shall have the same voting powers as any member of said council. The mayor shall be considered a member of the governing body and the city council. However, a city may provide by ordinance that the mayor shall not be entitled to vote on any matter before the council, except in the case of a tie vote. If such an ordinance is adopted, it shall also provide that any ordinance adopted and all resolutions authorizing the expenditure of money or the entering into of a contract shall be subject to disapproval by the mayor as provided in section 31-16-104. Such an ordinance may provide or may be amended to provide that the mayor shall not be counted for purposes of determining a quorum or the requisite majority on any matter to be voted on by the council. Any such ordinance may be adopted, amended, or repealed only within the sixty days preceding the election of any mayor, to take effect upon such mayor's assumption of office.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1024, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 81:

(3) amended, p. 1493, § 3, effective May 28.

L. 83:

(1) amended, p. 1253, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 89:

(3) amended, p. 1287, § 3, effective April 6.

L. 2008:

(1) amended, p. 1252, § 3, effective August 5.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former §§ 31-5-102 and 31-5-103 as they existed prior to 1975. For a detailed comparison, see the comparative tables located in the back of the index.

31-4-103. Mayor - vacancy - appointment - mayor pro tem.

In case of the mayor's death, disability, resignation, or other vacation of his office, the city council may order a special election as soon as practicable to fill the vacancy until the term of office of a successor elected at the next regular election has commenced, as provided in section 31-4-105, and the city council may appoint some registered elector to act as mayor until such special election. Such special election shall be conducted in accordance with the provisions of the "Colorado Municipal Election Code of 1965". If the city council does not call a special election, it shall fill the vacancy by appointment until the term of office of a successor elected at the next regular election has commenced, as provided in section 31-4-105.

The city council may appoint one of their own number acting mayor or mayor pro tem who is entitled to act as mayor in case the mayor is absent from the city or is for any reason temporarily unable to perform the duties of his office.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1024, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 79:

(1) amended, p. 1172, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 81:

(2) amended, p. 1494, § 4, effective May 28.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former §§ 31-5-103 and 31-5-106 as they existed prior to 1975. For a detailed comparison, see the comparative tables located in the back of the index.

Cross references:

For the "Colorado Municipal Election Code of 1965", see article 10 of this title.

31-4-104. Wards.

Every city shall be divided by the city council into wards, and such wards shall be numbered consecutively beginning with the number one. The boundaries of said wards shall not be changed more often than once in six years, unless change is necessary to conform to constitutional apportionment requirements. Territory added to the city shall become a part of such ward or wards as may be determined by ordinance; but this shall not prevent apportionment to conform to constitutional requirements. The boundaries and number of wards shall be changed only by majority vote of all members elected to the governing body.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1025, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-5-104 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-4-105. Election of officers - terms.

The registered electors of each city shall elect, at the regular election, a mayor, a clerk, and a city treasurer from the city at large. At the same election, the registered electors of each ward of the city shall elect two members of the city council. The election shall be conducted in accordance with the provisions of the "Colorado Municipal Election Code of 1965". The officers shall hold their respective offices for terms of two years, commencing at the first meeting of the governing body following the survey of election returns, unless the governing body provides by ordinance or resolution that terms shall commence on the first Monday after the first Tuesday in January following their election.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1025, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 94:

Entire section amended, p. 1191, § 90, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-3-101 (1) as it existed prior to 1975.

Cross references:

For the "Colorado Municipal Election Code of 1965", see article 10 of this title.

31-4-106. Councilman - residence - vacancies.

Each councilman shall have resided in the ward in which he is a candidate for a period of at least twelve consecutive months immediately preceding the date of the election and shall be a registered elector therein; except that, in case the boundaries of the ward are changed pursuant to section 31-2-104 or 31-4-104 or as a result of annexation, any person who has resided within territory added to the ward for the time prescribed in this section shall be deemed to have met the residence requirements for the ward to which the territory was added. If any councilman, during the term of his office, removes from or becomes a nonresident of the ward in which he was elected, he shall be deemed thereby to vacate his office, effective upon the adoption by the city council of a resolution declaring such vacancy to exist. If any vacancy occurs in the office of councilman because of death, resignation, or removal or for any other reason, the same shall be filled by appointment by a majority vote of the city council or by election as provided in section 31-4-108 (2)(b). A successor to the person so appointed or elected shall be elected at the next regular election.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1025, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 79:

Entire section amended, p. 1172, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 83:

Entire section amended, p. 1253, § 2, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-3-104 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-4-107. Appointment of officers - terms.

The members of the city council elected for each city at the meeting at which their terms commence, as provided in section 31-4-105, shall organize the city council. A majority of the total number of members is necessary to constitute a quorum for the transaction of business. They shall be judges of the election returns and qualification of their own members, and they shall determine the rules of their own proceedings. The city clerk shall keep a record of the proceedings, in such form as determined by the city council, which shall be open to the inspection and examination of any citizen. The councilmen may compel the attendance of absent members in such manner and under such penalties as they think fit to prescribe and shall elect from their own body a temporary president.

Upon taking office, or at such other time as may be provided by ordinance or resolution, the city council shall appoint a city attorney and shall appoint or provide for the appointment of such other officers as may be required by statute or ordinance and may appoint such other officers, including a city administrator, as may be necessary or desirable. One or more municipal judges shall be appointed in accordance with section 13-10-105 (1), C.R.S.

One person may hold two or more appointive offices if provided by ordinance and if compatible with the interest of the city government as determined by the council. All officers of the city are subject to the control and direction of the mayor and may be removed by a vote of a majority of all members elected to the city council if appointed to serve at the pleasure of the city council or by such a vote on charges of incompetence, unfitness, neglect of duty, or insubordination, duly made and sustained, if appointed to serve for a term prescribed by ordinance; except that a municipal judge may be removed during his term of office only for cause, as set forth in section 13-10-105 (2), C.R.S. The council may provide by ordinance for the removal or suspension of any officer or employee, except the mayor, councilmen, clerk, treasurer, city administrator, city attorney, and municipal judge, by administrative proceeding presided over by a city officer or employee.

The city council may provide by ordinance for four-year overlapping terms of office for council members. The ordinance may also provide for four-year terms for the mayor and other elective officers. The city council may reinstate the two-year terms provided in this section by ordinance. Any ordinance passed pursuant to this subsection (3) shall be enacted at least one hundred eighty days before the next regular election and shall be subject, notwithstanding an emergency declaration, to referendum if the referendum is brought pursuant to section 31-11-105 or pursuant to an applicable municipal ordinance enacted in accordance with section 1 of article V of the state constitution. No ordinance enacted pursuant to this subsection (3) shall extend or reduce the term for which any person was elected. If any vacancy occurs in an office for which a four-year term is in effect pursuant to this subsection (3), such vacancy shall be filled as provided in sections 31-4-106 and 31-4-108 (2)(b). If the office in which the vacancy occurs is not an office for which a successor would otherwise have been elected at the next regular election, the term of office of the successor elected at that regular election shall be shortened so that the following regular election for said office is held at the time at which it would have been held if no vacancy had occurred.

The city council may submit, by ordinance or resolution, for the approval of the registered electors at a regular or special election a proposal that the position of city clerk or city treasurer, or both such positions, be made appointive rather than elective, the appointments to be made by the city council. Such measure shall be made to take effect in such manner as to avoid shortening or extending the terms of any persons elected to such offices. If approved, appointments to either of such offices shall be in the manner provided for other appointive offices.

The city council may also, by ordinance or resolution, submit for the approval of the registered electors a proposal for returning the office of clerk or treasurer, or both, from appointive to elective status. No such proposal, if approved, shall extend or reduce the term for which any person holds office.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1025, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 77:

(2)(b) amended, p. 794, § 5, effective May 28.

L. 79:

(3) amended, p. 1173, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 81:

(2)(b) amended, p. 1494, § 5, effective May 28.

L. 83:

(3) amended, p. 1254, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 93:

(3) amended, p. 698, § 5, effective May 4.

L. 94:

(1) and (2)(a) amended, p. 1192, § 91, effective July 1.

L. 95:

(3) amended, p. 440, § 26, effective May 8.

Editor's note:

The provisions of this section are similar to provisions of several former sections as they existed prior to 1975. For a detailed comparison, see the comparative tables located at the back of the index.

31-4-108. Expulsion from city council - vacancies in other offices.

Any member of the city council may be expelled or removed from office, for good cause shown, by a vote of two-thirds of all the members elected to the city council, but he may not be removed a second time for the same offense.

In case any office of an appointive officer becomes vacant before the regular expiration of the term thereof, the vacancy shall be filled by the city council by appointment.

In case any office of an elective officer becomes vacant before the regular expiration of the term thereof, the vacancy may be filled by the city council by appointment or by election until the term of office of a successor elected at the next regular election has commenced as provided in section 31-4-105. If the city council does not fill the vacancy by appointment or order an election within sixty days after the vacancy occurs, it shall order an election, subject to the municipal election code, as soon as practicable to fill the vacancy until the term of office of a successor elected at the next regular election has commenced as provided in section 31-4-105.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1026, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 83:

Entire section amended, p. 1254, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 88:

(2)(b) amended, p. 1125, § 4, effective April 4.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-5-108 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-4-109. Compensation and fees of officers.

The mayor shall receive such compensation for his services as the city council, prior to his election, may fix as provided in this section. The city council, at least as early as the last monthly meeting before such regular municipal election, shall fix by ordinance the compensation and fees of members of the city council, including the compensation of the mayor and councilmen, for the period for which they will be elected or appointed if any change in said compensation is desirable. The city council shall neither increase nor diminish the compensation of any councilman or mayor during his term of office. Each person appointed to fill a vacancy in the office of mayor or councilman shall receive the same compensation as was established for the office when the vacancy occurred. All other officers of the city, together with all other employees of the city, shall receive such compensation as the city council may fix from time to time by ordinance or as may be established in a pay plan adopted by ordinance. The city council may from time to time contract for professional services and for such services pay such fees and charges as may be agreed upon.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1026, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-3-102 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-4-110. City clerk - duties - city seal.

The city clerk shall have the custody of all the laws and ordinances of the city council, shall keep a regular record of the proceedings of the city council, in such form as determined by the council, and shall perform such other duties as may be required by statute or by the ordinances of the city. The clerk shall continue in office until a successor is appointed or elected and has complied with section 31-4-401.

Each city council shall provide for the clerk's office a seal, which shall be the seal of the city, in the center of which shall be the word "Seal" and such other device as may be directed by ordinance and around the margin the name of the city and the state. Said seal shall be affixed to all transcripts, orders, or certificates which may be necessary or proper to authenticate under law or any ordinance of the city. For all attested certificates and transcripts other than those ordered by the city council, the same fees shall be paid to the clerk as are allowed to county officers for similar services.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1027, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 83:

(1) amended, p. 1255, § 5, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former §§ 31-5-105 and 31-5-107 as they existed prior to 1975. For a detailed comparison, see the comparative tables in the back of the index.

31-4-111. City treasurer - powers and duties.

The city treasurer has such powers and shall perform such duties as are prescribed by the statutes of this state and by the ordinances of the city council not inconsistent therewith.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1027, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-3-103 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-4-112. Marshal or chief of police - duties.

The marshal or chief of police shall execute and return, by himself or herself or by any member of the police force, all writs and processes directed to him or her by the municipal judge in any case arising under a city ordinance. In criminal cases, quasi-criminal cases, or cases in violation of city ordinances, he or she may serve the same in any part of the county in which such city is situate. The marshal, chief of police, or any member of the police force shall suppress all riots, disturbances, and breaches of the peace, shall apprehend all disorderly persons in the city, and shall pursue and arrest any person fleeing from justice in any part of the state. He or she shall apprehend any person in the act of committing any offense against the laws of the state or ordinances of the city and, forthwith and without any warrant, bring such person before a municipal judge, county judge, or other competent authority for examination and trial pursuant to law. He or she has, in the discharge of his or her proper duties, powers and responsibilities similar to those that sheriffs have in like cases. The marshal or chief of police may employ certified peace officers to enforce all laws of the state of Colorado notwithstanding section 16-2.5-201.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1027, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2017:

Entire section amended, SB 17-066, ch. 105, p. 385, § 1, effective April 4.

31-4-112.1. Chief of police - permits for concealed weapons. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 81:

Entire section added, p. 1437, § 2, effective June 8.

L. 2003:

Entire section repealed, p. 650, § 9, effective May 17.

31-4-113. Terms of officers end upon adoption of charter.

If any city adopts a charter pursuant to the provisions of article XX of the state constitution, the term of office of every officer of such city who has been elected or appointed pursuant to the general laws of this state or under the ordinances of such city shall terminate immediately upon the election and qualification of the elective officers provided for by such charter.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1027, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-5-109 as it existed prior to 1975.